District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.01

Short title.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 265, Pub. L. 87-569, § 1
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-301.01.
1981 Ed., § 29-501.
1973 Ed., § 29-1001.